Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [123B.023] NO MANDATES WITHOUT FUNDING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin District noncompliance allowed. new text end new text begin Until the amount of revenue needed to pay for a mandate identified in state law or rule is appropriated, a school district is not required to comply with a state mandate that: new text end new text begin (1) affects the daily operation of schools; new text end new text begin (2) affects the authority of a school board to establish locally developed education policies; new text end new text begin (3) changes a school district's curriculum; or new text end new text begin (4) changes a school district's spending priorities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin A school district must comply with a mandate if the amount of revenue needed for compliance is incidental compared to the school district's total budget. A school district must continue to comply with any law governing financial audit requirements or directly affecting the life, safety, and health of students. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section applies to state mandates that are in effect after June 30, 2025. new text end